Washington statutes.
RCW 36.17.020

Schedule of salaries. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

The county legislative authority of each county or a county commissioner or councilmember salary commission which conforms with RCW 36.17.024 is authorized to establish the salaries of the elected officials of the county. The state and county shall contribute to the costs of the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney as set forth in subsection (11) of this section. The annual salary of a county elected official shall not be less than the following:

(1) In each county with a population of one million or more: Auditor, clerk, treasurer, sheriff, members of the county legislative authority, and coroner, eighteen thousand dollars; and assessor, nineteen thousand dollars;

(2) In each county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one million: Auditor, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; clerk, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; treasurer, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; sheriff, nineteen thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, nineteen thousand five hundred dollars; and coroner, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars;

(3) In each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand: Auditor, sixteen thousand dollars; clerk, sixteen thousand dollars; treasurer, sixteen thousand dollars; sheriff, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; assessor, sixteen thousand dollars; members of the county legislative authority, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; and coroner, sixteen thousand dollars;

(4) In each county with a population of from seventy thousand to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand: Auditor, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; clerk, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; treasurer, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; assessor, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; sheriff, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; and coroner, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars;

(5) In each county with a population of from forty thousand to less than seventy thousand: Auditor, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; clerk, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; treasurer, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; assessor, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; sheriff, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; and coroner, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars;

(6) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to less than forty thousand: Auditor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, eleven thousand dollars;

(7) In each county with a population of from twelve thousand to less than eighteen thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, nine thousand four hundred dollars;

(8) In each county with a population of from eight thousand to less than twelve thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, seven thousand dollars;

(9) In each county with a population of from five thousand to less than eight thousand: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;

(10) In each other county: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; and members of the county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;

(11) The state of Washington shall contribute an amount equal to one-half the salary of a superior court judge towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney. Upon receipt of the state contribution, a county shall continue to contribute towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney in an amount that equals or exceeds that contributed by the county in 2008.

[ 2008 c 309 s 2; 2001 c 73 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 4 s 1; 1991 c 363 s 52; 1973 1st ex.s. c 88 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 237 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 226 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 77 s 2; 1967 c 218 s 3; 1963 c 164 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.17.020. Prior: 1957 c 219 s 3; prior: (i) 1953 c 264 s 1; 1949 c 200 s 1, part; 1945 c 87 s 1, part; 1937 c 197 s 3, part; 1933 c 136 s 6, part; 1925 ex.s. c 148 s 6, part; 1919 c 168 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4200-5a, part. (ii) 1921 c 184 s 2; RRS s 4203.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 309: "The legislature finds that an elected county prosecuting attorney functions as both a state officer in pursuing criminal cases on behalf of the state of Washington, and as a county officer who acts as civil counsel for the county, and provides services to school districts and lesser taxing districts by statute.

The elected prosecuting attorney's dual role as a state officer and a county officer is reflected in various provisions of the state Constitution and within state statute.

The legislature finds that the responsibilities and decisions required of the elected prosecuting attorney are essentially the same in every county within Washington state, from a decision to seek the death penalty in an aggravated murder case, to the decision not to prosecute but refer an offender to drug court; from a decision to pursue child rape charges based solely upon the testimony of the child, to a decision to divert juvenile offenders out of the justice system. Therefore, the legislature finds that elected prosecuting attorneys need to exercise the same level of skill and expertise in the least populous county as in the most populous county.

The legislature finds that the salary of the elected county prosecuting attorney should be tied to that of a superior court judge. This furthers the state's interests and responsibilities under the state Constitution, and is consistent with the current practice of several counties in Washington state, the practices of several other states, and the national district attorneys' association national standards." [ 2008 c 309 s 1.]

Effective date—2008 c 309: "This act takes effect July 1, 2008." [ 2008 c 309 s 3.]

Findings—Intent—Severability—2001 c 73: See notes following RCW 35.21.015.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 237: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 237 s 4.]

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 237: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1972." [ 1971 ex.s. c 237 s 5.]

Counties with populations of less than five thousand, combined office of auditor and clerk, salary: RCW 36.16.032.

PDFRCW 36.17.020

Schedule of salaries. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

The county legislative authority of each county or a county commissioner or councilmember salary commission which conforms with RCW 36.17.024 is authorized to establish the salaries of the elected officials of the county. The state and county shall contribute to the costs of the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney as set forth in subsection (11) of this section. The annual salary of a county elected official shall not be less than the following:

(1) In each county with a population of one million or more: Auditor, clerk, treasurer, sheriff, members of the county legislative authority, and coroner, eighteen thousand dollars; and assessor, nineteen thousand dollars;

(2) In each county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one million: Auditor, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; clerk, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; treasurer, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; sheriff, nineteen thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, nineteen thousand five hundred dollars; and coroner, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars;

(3) In each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand: Auditor, sixteen thousand dollars; clerk, sixteen thousand dollars; treasurer, sixteen thousand dollars; sheriff, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; assessor, sixteen thousand dollars; members of the county legislative authority, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; and coroner, sixteen thousand dollars;

(4) In each county with a population of from seventy thousand to less than one hundred twenty-five thousand: Auditor, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; clerk, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; treasurer, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; assessor, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; sheriff, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; and coroner, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars;

(5) In each county with a population of from forty thousand to less than seventy thousand: Auditor, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; clerk, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; treasurer, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; assessor, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; sheriff, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; and coroner, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars;

(6) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to less than forty thousand: Auditor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, eleven thousand dollars; and coroner, $11,000 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;

(7) In each county with a population of from twelve thousand to less than eighteen thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, nine thousand four hundred dollars; and coroner, $9,400 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;

(8) In each county with a population of from eight thousand to less than twelve thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, seven thousand dollars; and coroner, $7,000 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;

(9) In each county with a population of from five thousand to less than eight thousand: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars; and coroner, $6,500 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;

(10) In each other county: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; members of the county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars; and coroner, $6,500 or on a per case basis as determined by the county legislative authority;

(11) The state of Washington shall contribute an amount equal to one-half the salary of a superior court judge towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney. Upon receipt of the state contribution, a county shall continue to contribute towards the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney in an amount that equals or exceeds that contributed by the county in 2008.

[ 2021 c 127 s 6; 2008 c 309 s 2; 2001 c 73 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 4 s 1; 1991 c 363 s 52; 1973 1st ex.s. c 88 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 237 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 226 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 77 s 2; 1967 c 218 s 3; 1963 c 164 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.17.020. Prior: 1957 c 219 s 3; prior: (i) 1953 c 264 s 1; 1949 c 200 s 1, part; 1945 c 87 s 1, part; 1937 c 197 s 3, part; 1933 c 136 s 6, part; 1925 ex.s. c 148 s 6, part; 1919 c 168 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4200-5a, part. (ii) 1921 c 184 s 2; RRS s 4203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 127 ss 4 and 6: See note following RCW 36.16.030.

Findings—2008 c 309: "The legislature finds that an elected county prosecuting attorney functions as both a state officer in pursuing criminal cases on behalf of the state of Washington, and as a county officer who acts as civil counsel for the county, and provides services to school districts and lesser taxing districts by statute.

The elected prosecuting attorney's dual role as a state officer and a county officer is reflected in various provisions of the state Constitution and within state statute.

The legislature finds that the responsibilities and decisions required of the elected prosecuting attorney are essentially the same in every county within Washington state, from a decision to seek the death penalty in an aggravated murder case, to the decision not to prosecute but refer an offender to drug court; from a decision to pursue child rape charges based solely upon the testimony of the child, to a decision to divert juvenile offenders out of the justice system. Therefore, the legislature finds that elected prosecuting attorneys need to exercise the same level of skill and expertise in the least populous county as in the most populous county.

The legislature finds that the salary of the elected county prosecuting attorney should be tied to that of a superior court judge. This furthers the state's interests and responsibilities under the state Constitution, and is consistent with the current practice of several counties in Washington state, the practices of several other states, and the national district attorneys' association national standards." [ 2008 c 309 s 1.]

Effective date—2008 c 309: "This act takes effect July 1, 2008." [ 2008 c 309 s 3.]

Findings—Intent—Severability—2001 c 73: See notes following RCW 35.21.015.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 237: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 237 s 4.]

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 237: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1972." [ 1971 ex.s. c 237 s 5.]

Counties with populations of less than five thousand, combined office of auditor and clerk, salary: RCW 36.16.032.